Utah statutes.
9-7-308.   Books to be stamped and labeled.
The state law librarian shall cause every book in the State Law Library to be
labeled with a printed or stamped label containing the words "Utah State Law
Library," and shall cause the same words to be written or stamped on one or
more pages of each volume.
